src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Kalaallit% Airports+Sem/inst:Kalaallit% Airports Zateq_oqsPZ ;
Kalaallit% Airports% International+Sem/inst:Kalaallit% Airports% International Zateq_oqsPZ ;
Kalaallit% Airports% International% A/S+Sem/inst:Kalaallit% Airports% International% A/S Zateq_oqsPZ ;
Kalaallit% Airports% International% A/S% (KAIR)+Sem/inst:Kalaallit% Airports% International% A/S% (KAIR) Zateq_oqsPZ ;
